Vermont, session 2025-2026, H351.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 601 is amended to read:
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 2 of 14
§ 601. LICENSE REQUIRED
* * *
(b)(1)(A) All operator’s licenses issued under this chapter shall expire,
unless earlier cancelled, at midnight on the eve of the second or fourth
anniversary of the date of birth of the license holder following eight years after
the date of issue. Renewed licenses shall expire at midnight on the eve of the
second or fourth anniversary of the date of birth of the license holder following
the date the renewed license expired eight years after the date the renewed
license is issued.
(B) On or before July 1, 2029, an individual holding an operator’s
licenses that is valid until the individual’s second or fourth date of birth
following the date of issue may exchange that license for an operator’s license
that will expire at midnight eight years after the date on which the original
license was issued. The fee for an operator’s license obtained pursuant to an
exchange under the provisions of this subdivision (1) shall be $85.00 if a two-
year operator’s license was exchanged and $62.00 if a four-year operator’s
license was exchanged.
(2) All junior operator’s licenses shall expire, unless earlier cancelled, at
midnight on the eve of the second anniversary of the date of birth of the license
holder following the date of issue.
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 3 of 14
(3) A person born on February 29 shall, for the purposes of this section,
be considered as born on March 1.
* * *
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 603 is amended to read:
§ 603. APPLICATION FOR AND ISSUANCE OF LICENSE
(a)(1) The Commissioner or his or her the Commissioner’s authorized
agent may license operators and junior operators when an application, on a
form prescribed by the Commissioner, signed and sworn to by the applicant for
the license, is filed with him or her the Commissioner, accompanied by the
required license fee and any valid license from another state or Canadian
jurisdiction is surrendered.
(2) The Commissioner may, however, in his or her the Commissioner’s
discretion, refuse to issue a license to any person whenever he or she the
Commissioner is satisfied from information given him or her the
Commissioner by credible persons, and upon investigation, that the person is
mentally or physically unfit or, because of his or her the person’s habits or
record as to crashes or convictions, is unsafe to be trusted with the operation of
motor vehicles. A person refused a license under the provisions of this
subsection shall be entitled to hearing as provided in sections 105–107 of this
title.
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 4 of 14
(3) Any new or renewal application form shall include a space for the
applicant to request that a “veteran” designation be placed on his or her the
applicant’s license certificate. An applicant who requests the designation shall
provide a Department of Defense Form 214 or other proof of veteran status
specified by the Commissioner.
* * *
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section:
(1) A citizen of a foreign country shall produce his or her the
individual’s passport and visa, alien registration receipt card (green card), or
other proof of legal presence for inspection and copying as a part of the
application process for an operator’s license, junior operator’s license, or
learner’s permit.
(2) An operator’s license, junior operator’s license, or learner’s permit
issued to a citizen of a foreign country shall expire coincidentally with his or
her the individual’s authorized duration of stay.
(e)(1) A citizen of a foreign country unable to establish legal presence in
the United States who furnishes reliable proof of Vermont residence and of
name, date of birth, and place of birth, and who satisfies all other requirements
of this chapter for obtaining a license or permit, shall be eligible to obtain an
operator’s privilege card, a junior operator’s privilege card, or a learner’s
privilege card.
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 5 of 14
(2) The Commissioner shall require applicants under this subsection to
furnish a document or a combination of documents that reliably proves the
applicant’s name, date of birth, and place of birth. The Commissioner may
prescribe the documents or combination of documents that meets these criteria.
However, the Commissioner shall accept a combination of two or more of the
following documents to establish the name, date of birth, and place of birth of
an applicant:
(A) a valid foreign passport, with or without a U.S. Customs and
Border Protection entry form or stamp;
(B) a valid consular identification document issued by the
government of Mexico or of Guatemala or by any other government with
comparable security standards and protocols, as determined by the
Commissioner; and
(C) a certified record of the applicant’s birth, marriage, adoption, or
divorce, including a translation if necessary.
(3) The Commissioner shall require applicants under this subsection to
furnish a document or a combination of documents that reliably proves the
applicant’s Vermont residence. The Commissioner may prescribe the
documents or combination of documents that meets these criteria. However,
the Commissioner shall accept the following combinations of documents as
proof of Vermont residence:
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 6 of 14
(A)(i) two pieces of mail received by the applicant within the prior
30 days with the applicant’s current name and residential Vermont address;
and
(ii) at least one of the documents specified in subdivision (B) of
this subdivision (3); or
(B) two of the following that show name and residential Vermont
address:
(i) a vehicle title or registration;
(ii) a document issued by a financial institution, such as a bank
statement;
(iii) a document issued by an insurance company or agent, such as
an insurance card, binder, or bill;
(iv) a document issued by an educational institution, such as a
transcript, report card, or enrollment confirmation;
(v) federal tax documents, such as W-2 or 1099 forms;
(vi) State tax documents, such as an IN-111; and
(vii) medical health records, receipts, or bills.
(f) Persons able to establish lawful presence in the United States but who
otherwise fail to comply with the requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005,
Pub. L. No. 109-13, §§ 201–202, shall be eligible for an operator’s privilege
card, a junior operator’s privilege card, or a learner’s privilege card, provided
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 7 of 14
the applicant furnishes reliable proof of Vermont residence and of name, date
of birth, and place of birth, and satisfies all other requirements of this chapter
for obtaining a license or permit. The Commissioner shall require applicants
under this subsection to furnish a document or a combination of documents
that reliably proves the applicant’s Vermont residence and his or her the
applicant’s name, date of birth, and place of birth.
* * *
(h) A privilege card issued under this section shall:
(1) on its face bear the phrase “privilege card” and text indicating that it
is not valid for federal identification or official purposes; and
(2) expire at midnight on the eve of the second birthday of the applicant
following eight years after the date of issuance or, at the option of an applicant
for an operator’s privilege card and upon payment of the required four-year
fee, at midnight on the eve of the fourth birthday of the applicant following the
date of issuance.
* * *
(j) On or before July 1, 2029, an individual holding a privilege card under
this section that is valid until the individual’s second or fourth date of birth
following the date of issue may exchange that license for a privilege card that
will expire at midnight eight years after the date on which the privilege card
was issued. The fee for a privilege card obtained pursuant to an exchange
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 8 of 14
under the provisions of this subsection shall be $85.00 if a two-year privilege
card was exchanged and $62.00 if a four-year privilege card was exchanged.
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 608 is amended to read:
§ 608. FEES
(a)(1) The four-year fee required to be paid the Commissioner for licensing
an operator of motor vehicles or for issuing an operator’s privilege card shall
be $62.00. The two-year fee required to be paid the Commissioner for
licensing an operator or for issuing an operator’s privilege card shall be $39.00
The eight-year fee required to be paid the Commissioner for licensing an
operator of motor vehicles or for issuing an operator’s privilege card shall be
$124.00, and the two-year fee for licensing a junior operator or for issuing a
junior operator’s privilege card shall be $39.00.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection:
(A) for an individual whose household income is less than 150
percent of the Federal Poverty Level, the eight-year fee required to be paid the
Commissioner for licensing an operator of motor vehicles or for issuing an
operator’s privilege card shall be $0.00; and
(B) for an individual whose household income is less than 200
percent of the Federal Poverty Level, the eight-year fee required to be paid the
Commissioner for licensing an operator of motor vehicles or for issuing an
operator’s privilege card shall be $62.00.
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 9 of 14
(b)(1) An additional fee of $4.00 per year shall be paid for a motorcycle
endorsement. The endorsement may be obtained for either a two-year or four-
year an eight-year period, to be coincidental with the length of the operator’s
license.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection:
(A) for an individual whose household income is less than 150
percent of the Federal Poverty Level, the additional fee for a motorcycle
endorsement shall be $0.00 per year; and
(B) for an individual whose household income is less than 200
percent of the Federal Poverty Level, the additional fee for a motorcycle
endorsement shall be $2.00 per year.
Sec. 4. 23 V.S.A. § 115 is amended to read:
§ 115. NONDRIVER IDENTIFICATION CARDS
* * *
(b)(1) Every identification card shall expire, unless earlier canceled, at
12:00 midnight on the eve of the fourth anniversary of the date of birth of the
cardholder following eight years after the date of original issue and may be
renewed every four eight years upon payment of a $29.00 fee.
(2) A renewed identification card shall expire, unless earlier canceled, at
12:00 midnight on the eve of the fourth anniversary of the date of birth of the
cardholder following eight years after the expiration of the card being renewed.
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 10 of 14
(3) At least 30 days before an identification card will expire, the
Commissioner shall mail first-class to the cardholder or send the cardholder
electronically an application to renew the identification card; a cardholder shall
be sent the renewal notice by mail unless the cardholder opts in to receive
electronic notification.
(4) On or before July 1, 2029, an individual holding an identification
card that is valid until the individual’s fourth date of birth following the date of
issue may exchange that identification card for an identification card that will
expire eight years after the date on which the original identification card was
issued. The shall be no fee to exchange a four-year identification card for an
eight-year identification card pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision.
(5) An individual born on February 29 shall, for the purposes of this
section, be considered as born on March 1.
* * *
(l)(1) The Commissioner shall issue identification cards to Vermont
residents who are not U.S. citizens but are able to establish lawful presence in
the United States if an applicant follows the procedures and furnishes
documents as required under subsection 603(d) of this title and any applicable
policies or adopted rules, and otherwise satisfies the requirements of this
section. The identification cards shall expire consistent with subsection 603(d)
of this title.
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 11 of 14
(2) The Commissioner shall issue non-REAL ID compliant
identification cards to Vermont residents unable to establish lawful presence in
the United States if an applicant follows the procedures and furnishes
documents as required under subsection 603(e) of this title and any applicable
policies or adopted rules, and otherwise satisfies the requirements of this
section.
(3) The Commissioner shall issue non-REAL ID compliant
identification cards to Vermont residents able to establish lawful presence in
the United States but who otherwise fail to comply with the requirements of
the REAL ID Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-13, §§ 201–202, if the applicant
follows the procedures and furnishes documents as required under subsection
603(f) of this title and any applicable policies or adopted rules, and otherwise
satisfies the requirements of this section.
(4) A non-REAL ID compliant identification card issued under
subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection shall bear on its face text indicating
that it is not valid for federal identification or official purposes.
* * *
Sec. 5. INTENT; REPORT
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) individuals be able to obtain an operator’s license, privilege card, or
nondriver identification that accurately reflects the individual’s full, legal
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 12 of 14
name, including individuals with multiple first or last names, or whose names
contain special characters; and
(2) unhoused individuals and individuals without a permanent residence
be able to obtain an operator’s license, privilege card, or nondriver
identification.
(b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall, on or before December 31,
2025, report to the House and Senate Committees on Transportation regarding:
(1) the Department’s ability to issue operator’s licenses, privilege cards,
and nondriver identification cards that accurately reflects the holder’s full,
legal name;
(2) any technological, practical, or legal impediments that prevent the
Department from issuing operator’s licenses, privilege cards, and nondriver
identification cards that accurately reflect the holder’s full, legal name;
(3) any measures necessary to address the impediments identified
pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection;
(4) legal and practical issues that prevent or limit the Department’s
ability to issue operator’s licenses, privilege cards, and nondriver
identifications to individuals who are unhoused or who lack a permanent
residence;
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 13 of 14
(5) a proposed process to enable the Department to issue operator’s
licenses, privilege cards, and nondriver identifications to individuals who are
unhoused or who lack a permanent residence; and
(6) any legislative action necessary to implement the process described
pursuant to subdivision (5) of this subsection.
Sec. 6. OUTREACH
(a) On or before November 15, 2025, the Department of Motor Vehicles
shall develop and implement a public education and outreach campaign to
inform Vermont residents about:
(1) an individual’s rights to obtain an operator’s license, privilege card,
or nondriver identification card;
(2) the ability to obtain an operator’s license, privilege card, or
nondriver identification card that expires eight years after the date of issue;
(3) an individual’s rights to self-attest with respect to the gender marker
on the individual’s operator’s license, privilege card, or nondriver
identification card; and
(4) reduced fees and fee waivers that are available to households that
meet certain income thresholds.
(b) The education and outreach campaign shall include printed materials
and public service announcements on television, radio, internet, and social
media.
VT LEG #380662 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.351
2025 Page 14 of 14
(c) Public service announcements created for the education and outreach
campaign shall be in both English and Spanish. Printed materials created for
the education and outreach campaign shall be in English, Spanish, and the next
eight most commonly spoken languages in Vermont.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380662 v.1